Arkansas, session 2025, HB1363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-101(b), concerning the emergency
relocation of the seat of government, is amended to read as follows to repeal
an incorrect reference:
(b) During such time as the seat of government remains at the
emergency temporary location, all official acts required by law to be
performed at the seat of government by any officer, agency, department, or
authority of this state, including the convening and meeting of the General
Assembly in regular session, or extraordinary session, or emergency session,
shall be are as valid and binding when performed at the emergency temporary
location as if performed at the normal location of the seat of government.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-1-114(a), concerning incorporation of
machine-readable privacy policies into state and local government websites,
is amended to read as follows to repeal obsolete language:
(a) Each unit of state and local government and each state agency that
operates or maintains a website shall incorporate a machine-readable privacy
*LGL060*
01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060

HB1363
policy into each of its websites no later than July 1, 2004.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 25-1-120(d)(2) and (3), concerning
comprehensive cross-sector collaboration by state agencies, boards, and
commissions concerning health disparities, are repealed because they are
obsolete.
(2) The first planning meeting under this subsection shall be held
no later than October 1, 2011.
(3) The first report under this subsection shall be submitted by
October 1, 2012.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 25-1-128(b)(2)(A), concerning policy
regarding the use of technology resources and cybersecurity by public
entities, is amended to read as follows to clarify the name of a state
entity:
(2)(A) Develop a cybersecurity policy for all technology resources
of the public entity based on the standards and guidelines set by the State
Cyber Security Cybersecurity Office.

SECTION 5. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 25-1-
128(c)(2), concerning policy regarding the use of technology resources and
cybersecurity by public entities, is amended to read as follows to clarify
the name of a state entity:
(2) The Department of Education, in coordination with the State
Cyber Security Cybersecurity Office, shall:

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 25-1-128(f), concerning policy regarding
the use of technology resources and cybersecurity by public entities, is
amended to read as follows to clarify the name of a state entity:
(f)(1) Each state entity shall submit a cybersecurity policy for the
state entity for approval to the State Cyber Security Cybersecurity Office by
October 1 of each even-numbered year.
(2) The State Cyber Security Cybersecurity Office shall establish
a procedure to review and approve state entity cybersecurity policies.
(3) The Department of Education shall:
(A) Develop a cybersecurity policy that shall be used by each
01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060

HB1363
type of state educational institution;
(B) Submit the policies developed under subdivision (f)(3)(A)
of this section for approval to the State Cyber Security Cybersecurity Office
by October 1 of each even-numbered year; and
(C) Coordinate with each state educational institution to
implement the cybersecurity policy.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 25-4-105(a)(1)(K), concerning the powers
and duties of the Division of Information Systems, is amended to read as
follows to clarify the name of a state entity:
(K) Providing a State Cyber Security Cybersecurity Office to
monitor information resource security issues, coordinating all security
measures that could be used to protect resources by more than one (1)
governmental entity, and acting as an information technology resource to
other state agencies;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 25-10-104(a), concerning the Board of
Developmental Disabilities Services, is amended to read as follows to repeal
obsolete language:
(a) The Board of Developmental Disabilities Services and the
institutional and supportive facilities of the human development centers
located at Alexander, Conway, Arkadelphia, Jonesboro, Booneville, and the
Southeast Arkansas Human Development Center at Warren, and all improvements
and additions to those institutional units made subsequent to February 4,
1971, shall be operated under the control of the board within the Department
of Human Services.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 25-10-111(a)(1), concerning the budgeting
of the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as follows to clarify
a reference and repeal obsolete language:
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall obtain
from each division, office, section, or unit of the Department of Human
Services, including the institutions and institutional boards thereunder
under the department, all requests for biennial appropriations and all
requests for special supplemental or construction appropriations.

01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060

HB1363
SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 25-16-611 is repealed because it is
obsolete due to the referenced sales being under Acts 1844, § 5, p.30, and
sales of state lands now being under the Commissioner of State Lands.
25-16-611. Quarterly report on notes and on moneys from sale of state
lands.
The Treasurer of State shall report quarterly to the Governor the
amount of notes on hand and by whom drawn and the amount of moneys received
and on hand on account of the sale of state lands.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(4), concerning stipends for
members of certain state boards, is repealed because the referenced entity
does not exist.
(4) Athletics and Activities Board;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(24), concerning stipends for
members of certain state boards, is repealed because the referenced entity
was abolished.
(24) Arkansas State Board of Registration for Foresters
[abolished];

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(48), concerning stipends for
members of certain state boards, is repealed because the referenced entity
was abolished.
(48) Veterinary Medical Examining Board [abolished];

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(49), concerning stipends for
members of certain state boards, is repealed because the referenced entity
was abolished.
(49) Commission on Water Well Construction [abolished];

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 25-16-904(8), concerning stipends for
members of certain state boards, is repealed because the referenced entity
does not exist.
(8) Arkansas Health Policy Council;

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 25-16-907 is amended to read as follows to
01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060

HB1363
repeal obsolete language and make stylistic changes:
25-16-907. Effective date Sole authority for expense reimbursement, per
diem, and stipends.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this
subchapter becomes effective on a board-by-board basis on the date of the
board's first regularly scheduled meeting in 1996, and, thereafter, this This
subchapter shall be is the sole authority for expense reimbursement, per
diem, and stipends for a state board.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, for
boards which do not have regularly scheduled meetings, this subchapter
becomes effective on a board-by-board basis on the date of the board's first
meeting in 1996, and, thereafter, this subchapter shall be the sole authority
for expense reimbursement, per diem, and stipends.
(b) Any state board may, by a majority vote of the total membership of
the board cast during any meeting in 1995, exercise its powers under this
subchapter for calendar year 1995, but, until a board acts or has the
opportunity to act in 1996, the law existing on February 1, 1995, as to the
board's expense reimbursement and per diem authorization shall apply.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 25-16-908 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language:
25-16-908. Distribution of copies.
As soon as possible after April 11, 1995, the The Department of Finance
and Administration shall provide a copy of this subchapter to every state
board which that is subject to the provisions hereof this subchapter.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 25-18-223 is repealed because the section
is obsolete.
25-18-223. Book report of Secretary of State.
(a)(1)(A) The Secretary of State shall compile, edit, and publish a
bound book report of the Secretary of State for the period ending December
31, 2018.
(B) The book report shall pertain to substantially the
same subject matter as the earlier biennial reports of the Secretary of State
and other data, both historical and contemporary, that in the opinion of the
Secretary of State would be of interest to all citizens of Arkansas.
01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060

HB1363
(2) The book report shall be printed under the proper contract
for state printing.
(b) The Secretary of State shall distribute the book reports in the
following manner:
(1) One (1) copy to each city, county, regional, public school,
parochial school, and institution of higher learning library in the State of
Arkansas; and
(2) One (1) copy to elected officials upon written request
received by the Secretary of State no later than March 31, 2019.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 25-18-604(c), concerning retention
requirements for public records, is amended to read as follows to repeal
obsolete language:
(c) Each state agency shall comply with the rules and guidelines
promulgated under this subchapter by July 1, 2007.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 25-19-103(5)(A), concerning definitions
under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows
to add clarifying language:
(5)(A) “Municipally owned utility system” means a utility system
owned or operated by a municipality that provides:
(i) Electricity;
(ii) Water;
(iii) Wastewater service;
(iv) Cable television; or
(v) Broadband service.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 25-19-106(d)(5), concerning open meetings
under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is repealed because the
subdivision is obsolete.
(5) Cities of the second class and incorporated towns are exempt
from subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section until July 1, 2020.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 25-19-110(a), concerning exemptions under
the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language:
01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060

HB1363
(a) Beginning July 1, 2009, in In order to be effective, a law that
enacts a new exemption to the requirements of this chapter or that
substantially amends an existing exemption to the requirements of this
chapter shall state that the record or meeting is exempt from the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 25-19-111(e), concerning the Arkansas
Freedom of Information Task Force, is repealed because the subsection is
obsolete.
(e)(1) The initial members of the task force shall be appointed within
thirty (30) days of August 1, 2017.
(2)(A) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall call the
first meeting of the task force, which shall occur within sixty (60) days of
August 1, 2017.
(B) The task force shall begin its review under subdivision
(a)(2) of this section within thirty (30) days of the call of the first
meeting.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 25-26-304(11)(F), concerning areas of
collaboration under the Arkansas Cyber Initiative, is amended to read as
follows to clarify the name of a state entity:
(F) Fostering collaboration with the State Cyber Security
Cybersecurity Office for the ongoing improvement of cybersecurity efforts
across government entities.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 25-28-108(a), concerning specifications
for computer-assisted mass appraisal software, is amended to read as follows
to repeal obsolete language:
(a) By July 1, 2005, the The Assessment Coordination Division shall
adopt and implement by rules final specifications for computer-assisted mass
appraisal software.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 25-29-108 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language, update language, and make stylistic changes:
25-29-108. Articles of incorporation.
Within thirty (30) days after the first meeting of the The Board of
01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060

HB1363
Directors of the Arkansas Deaf and Hard of Hearing Telecommunications
Services Corporation, it shall cause keep articles of incorporation be filed
on file with the Secretary of State.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 25-34-105(b), concerning agency authority
and accounting under the Arkansas Computer and Electronic Solid Waste
Management Act, is repealed because the subsection is obsolete.
(b) Within sixty (60) days after August 13, 2001, each agency shall
prepare a plan to account for the sale of used equipment and present that
plan for review to the Department of Finance and Administration, the
Executive Chief Information Officer, and the Legislative Council.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1402(a)(3), concerning state
entities transferred to the Department of Public Safety, is amended to read
as follows to add clarifying language:
(3) The former Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board,
formerly created under § 12-10-318, now known as the "Arkansas 911 Board",
created under § 12-10-305;

SECTION 29. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.
01/31/2025 10:50:36 AM LGL060